Washington statutes.
RCW 43.160.070

Conditions.

Public facilities financial assistance, when authorized by the board, is subject to the following conditions:

(1) The moneys in the public facilities construction loan revolving account shall be used solely to fulfill commitments arising from financial assistance authorized in this chapter. The total outstanding amount which the board shall dispense at any time pursuant to this section shall not exceed the moneys available from the account.

(2) On contracts made for public facilities loans the board shall determine the interest rate which loans shall bear. The interest rate shall not exceed ten percent per annum. The board may provide reasonable terms and conditions for repayment for loans, including partial forgiveness of loan principal and interest payments on projects located in rural communities as defined by the board, or rural counties. The loans shall not exceed twenty years in duration.

(3) Repayments of loans made from the public facilities construction loan revolving account under the contracts for public facilities construction loans shall be paid into the public facilities construction loan revolving account. Repayments of loans from moneys from the new appropriation from the public works assistance account for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 1999, shall be paid into the public works assistance account.

(4) When every feasible effort has been made to provide loans and loans are not possible, the board may provide grants upon finding that unique circumstances exist.

[ 2008 c 327 s 6; 1999 c 164 s 104; 1998 c 321 s 27 (Referendum Bill No. 49, approved November 3, 1998); 1997 c 235 s 721; 1996 c 51 s 6; 1990 1st ex.s. c 16 s 802; 1983 1st ex.s. c 60 s 4; 1982 1st ex.s. c 40 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 327 ss 1, 2, 4-11, 17: See note following RCW 43.160.010.

Findings—Intent—Part headings and subheadings not law—Effective date—Severability—1999 c 164: See notes following RCW 43.160.010.

Purpose—Severability—1998 c 321: See notes following RCW 82.14.045.

Contingent effective dates—1998 c 321 ss 23-42: See note following RCW 35.58.410.

Severability—Effective date—1997 c 235: See notes following RCW 79A.15.040.

Severability—Effective dates—1996 c 51: See notes following RCW 43.160.010.

Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 16: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1990 1st ex.s. c 16 s 803.]